Illinois, session 104th, HB1063.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Works Jobs Program Act is amended 5by changing Section 20-20 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 559/20-20)7    Sec. 20-20. Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative. 8    (a) The Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative is 9established and shall be administered by the Department. 10        (1) Subject to the exceptions set forth in subsection 11    (b) of this Section, apprentices shall be utilized on all 12    public works projects estimated to cost $500,000 or more 13    in accordance with this subsection (a). 14        (2) For public works projects estimated to cost 15    $500,000 or more, the goal of the Illinois Works 16    Apprenticeship Initiative is that apprentices will perform 17    either 10% of the total labor hours actually worked in 18    each prevailing wage classification or 10% of the 19    estimated labor hours in each prevailing wage 20    classification, whichever is less. For contracts and grant 21    agreements executed after the effective date of this 22    amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and before 23    January 1, 2024, of this goal, at least 25% of the labor   HB1063- 2 -LRB104 03178 HLH 13199 b1    hours of each prevailing wage classification performed by 2    apprentices shall be performed by graduates of the 3    Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program, the Illinois 4    Climate Works Preapprenticeship Program, or the Highway 5    Construction Careers Training Program. For contracts and 6    grant agreements executed on or after January 1, 2024, of 7    this goal, at least 50% of the labor hours of each 8    prevailing wage classification performed by apprentices 9    shall be performed by graduates of the Illinois Works 10    Preapprenticeship Program, the Illinois Climate Works 11    Preapprenticeship Program, or the Highway Construction 12    Careers Training Program. 13        (3) For contracts and grant agreements executed on or 14    after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 15    104th General Assembly, in order for an apprentice to 16    qualify under this subsection (a), the apprenticeship 17    program in which the apprentice participates must provide 18    to the Department evidence that the apprenticeship program 19    has graduated, in each of the 3 calendar years immediately 20    preceding the date on which the public works project 21    begins, at least 2 apprentices in each construction craft 22    to be performed at the relevant project. Apprenticeship 23    programs are not required to provide graduation 24    information for the purposes of this paragraph (3) with 25    respect to apprenticeship crafts that are dedicated 26    exclusively to the transportation of materials and   HB1063- 3 -LRB104 03178 HLH 13199 b1    equipment to and from the project. This paragraph (3) does 2    not apply to public works projects contracted by school 3    districts or units of local government. 4    (b) Before or during the term of a contract subject to this 5Section, the Department may reduce or waive the goals set 6forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (a). Prior to the 7Department granting a request for a reduction or waiver, the 8Department shall determine, in its discretion, whether to hold 9a public hearing on the request. In determining whether to 10hold a public hearing, the Department may consider factors, 11including the scale of the project and whether the contractor 12or subcontractor seeking the reduction or waiver has 13previously requested reductions or waivers on other projects. 14The Department may also consult with the Business Enterprise 15Council under the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, 16and Persons with Disabilities Act and the Chief Procurement 17Officer of the agency administering the public works contract. 18The Department may grant a reduction or waiver upon a 19determination that: 20        (1) the contractor or subcontractor has demonstrated 21    that insufficient apprentices are available; 22        (2) the reasonable and necessary requirements of the 23    contract do not allow the goal to be met;24        (3) there is a disproportionately high ratio of 25    material costs to labor hours that makes meeting the goal 26    infeasible;  HB1063- 4 -LRB104 03178 HLH 13199 b1        (4) apprentice labor hour goals conflict with existing 2    requirements, including federal requirements, in 3    connection with the public work; or 4        (5) the contractor or subcontractor has demonstrated 5    that insufficient graduates of the Illinois Works 6    Preapprenticeship Program are available to meet the 7    requirements of paragraph (2) of subsection (a). 8    (c) Contractors and subcontractors must submit a 9certification to the Department and the agency that is 10administering the contract, or the grant agreement funding the 11contract, demonstrating that the contractor or subcontractor 12has:13        (1) met the apprentice labor hour goals set forth in 14    paragraph (2) of subsection (a); 15        (2) received a reduction or waiver pursuant to 16    subsection (b); or 17        (3) not complied with the labor hour goals in 18    paragraph (2) of subsection (a) and did not receive a 19    reduction or waiver pursuant to subsection (b). 20    It shall be deemed to be a material breach of the contract, 21or the grant agreement funding the contract, and entitle the 22State to declare a default, terminate the contract or grant 23agreement funding it, and exercise those remedies provided for 24in the contract, at law, or in equity if the contractor or 25subcontractor fails to submit the certification required in 26this subsection or submits false or misleading information.   HB1063- 5 -LRB104 03178 HLH 13199 b1    Intentional failure to comply with the Illinois Works 2Apprenticeship Initiative may result in the State agency that 3contracted or funded the public works project: (i) terminating 4the contract or agreement involved, (ii) prohibiting the party 5that contracted with the State from participating in public 6contracts or agreements for a period not to exceed 3 years, 7(iii) seeking a penalty of up to 25% of the contract or 8agreement as a result of the violation, or (iv) any 9combination of items (i) through (iii). State agencies shall 10report to the Department all projects that did not comply with 11the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative and any action 12taken against the noncompliant party and shall provide an 13action plan to address the reported instance of noncompliance 14with the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative. 15    (d) No later than one year after the effective date of this 16Act, and by April 1 of every calendar year thereafter, the 17Department of Labor shall submit a report to the Illinois 18Works Review Panel regarding the use of apprentices under the 19Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative for public works 20projects. To the extent it is available, the report shall 21include the following information: 22        (1) the total number of labor hours on each project 23    and the percentage of labor hours actually worked by 24    apprentices on each public works project; 25        (2) the number of apprentices used in each public 26    works project, broken down by trade; and   HB1063- 6 -LRB104 03178 HLH 13199 b1        (3) the number and percentage of minorities, women, 2    and veterans utilized as apprentices on each public works 3    project. 4    (e) The Department shall adopt any rules deemed necessary 5to implement the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative. In 6order to provide for the expeditious and timely implementation 7of this Act, the Department may adopt emergency rules. The 8adoption of emergency rules authorized by this subsection is 9deemed to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 10welfare. 11    (f) The Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative shall not 12interfere with any contracts or grants in existence on the 13effective date of this Act. 14    (g) Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in this 15Act, any State agency that administers a construction program 16for which federal law or regulations establish standards and 17procedures for the utilization of apprentices may implement 18the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative using the federal 19standards and procedures for the establishment of goals and 20utilization procedures for the State-funded, as well as the 21federally assisted, portions of the program. In such cases, 22these goals shall not exceed those established pursuant to the 23relevant federal statutes or regulations.24    (h) The Department shall maintain a list of graduates of 25the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program for a period of 26not less than one year after the participant graduates from   HB1063- 7 -LRB104 03178 HLH 13199 b1the Program. The list shall include the name, address, county 2of residence, phone number, email address, and the 3self-attested construction and building trade career path 4preferences of each graduate. This list shall be made 5available to any contractor or subcontractor, as well as any 6apprenticeship program approved by and registered with the 7United States Department of Labor's Bureau of Apprenticeship 8and Training in alignment with the graduate's self-attested 9construction and building trade career path preferences. 10(Source: P.A. 103-305, eff. 7-28-23.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.